Massachusetts, session 194th, H3792.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 33 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph 36 and inserting in place thereof 
the following paragraph:-  
(36) (a) For the reinstatement of any license or right to operate a motor vehicle which has 
been suspended or revoked pursuant to subsection (a) of section 22, the fee shall be $500.  
(b) For the reinstatement of any license or right to operate a motor vehicle which has 
been suspended or revoked pursuant to subsection (e) of section 22, sections 22F, 23, 24, except 
as otherwise provided below, section 24B, 24D, 24G, 24L or section 34J, and section 28 of 
chapter 266, the fee shall be $500. The fee for reinstatement following revocation pursuant to 
subparagraph (2) of paragraph (c) of subdivision (1) of said section 24 shall be $700 and the fee 
for such reinstatement following a revocation pursuant to subparagraphs (3) and (3 1/2) of said 
paragraph (c) of said subdivision (1) of said section 24 shall be $1,200; provided, however, that 

of 2 13 no person shall be made to pay a fee pursuant to this subparagraph unless said person was 
convicted, placed on probation, otherwise entered a plea of guilty to or admitted to a finding of 
sufficient facts of said subsection (e) of said section 22, said sections 22F, 23, 24, 24B, 24D, 
24G, 24L or said section 34J, or said section 28 of said chapter 266.  
(c) The fee for reinstatement of any license or right to operate a motor vehicle which has 
been suspended or revoked pursuant to any general or special law shall be $100, but the fee for 
reinstatement for suspensions and revocation pursuant to subsection (c) of section 22 shall be 
commensurate with the fee established for the corresponding Massachusetts offense resulting in 
the suspension or revocation pursuant to the General Laws.